Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2261.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7304.1. Additional employment history for certain Federal immigration enforcement applicants.(a) Applicability.--This section shall apply when a prospective employing law enforcement agency considers an applicant for employment as a law enforcement officer and the applicant is a current or former employee of the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement.(b) Form, disclosures and authorization.--Upon an offer of employment, an applicant shall complete and submit to the 123456789101112131415161718 prospective employing law enforcement agency a form developed by the commission and made available on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website. The form shall require all of the following:(1) A list of the name, telephone number and other relevant contact information for:(i) the applicant's current direct supervisor;(ii) each former direct supervisor during the applicant's employment with United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement; and(iii) each former direct supervisor for each position held by the applicant pertaining to immigration enforcement.(2) A signed authorization that permits the prospective employing law enforcement agency and the commission to contact each individual identified under paragraph (1) and to request and receive information and records to the extent necessary to administer this section.(3) A written statement indicating whether the applicant:(i) has been the subject of a deadly force investigation by a law enforcement agency, including United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, unless the investigation resulted in a finding that the allegations were false; or(ii) has been disciplined, discharged, nonrenewed, asked to resign, resigned or otherwise separated from employment while an allegation specified under subparagraph (i) was pending or under investigation or due to an adjudication or finding in connection with an 20260HB2261PN2958 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 allegation specified under subparagraph (i).(c) Employment history review.--Upon receipt of the form under subsection (b), the commission, in collaboration with the prospective employing law enforcement agency, shall conduct an employment history review by contacting each individual identified under subsection (b)(1) or another appropriate person if an identified individual is unavailable. The commission shall request all of the following:(1) The dates of the applicant's employment.(2) A statement indicating whether, during the applicant's employment, the applicant:(i) was the subject of a deadly force investigation, unless the investigation resulted in a finding that the allegations were false; or(ii) was disciplined, discharged, nonrenewed, asked to resign, resigned or otherwise separated from employment while an allegation specified under subparagraph (i) was pending or under investigation or due to an adjudication or finding in connection with an allegation specified under subparagraph (i).(d) Additional records after affirmative disclosure.--If the prospective employing law enforcement agency receives an affirmative response under subsection (b)(3) or (c)(2) and the prospective employing law enforcement agency determines to further consider the applicant for employment, the prospective employing law enforcement agency shall request that the applicant's former employer provide all information in its possession regarding the disclosed matter and related records. The request may not seek personally identifying information for an individual other than the applicant.20260HB2261PN2958 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) False statements or failures to disclose.--An applicant who provides false information or willfully fails to disclose information required under subsection (b) shall be subject to denial of employment or termination and may be subject to criminal prosecution under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).(f) Hiring prohibition.--A prospective employing law enforcement agency may not hire an applicant unless the applicant provides the form, disclosures and authorization required under subsection (b).(g) Commission fitness determination.--The commission shall review information received under subsection (d) and shall provide to the applicant and the prospective employing law enforcement agency a determination regarding whether the commission deems the applicant fit for employme nt. If the commission deems the applicant unfit, a prospective employing law enforcement agency may offer employment only if, before employing the applicant , the prospective employing law enforcement agency provides public notice of its intent to do so and states the prospective employing law enforcement agency's reasoning and rationale for employing the applicant . (h) Confidentiality.--Information obtained under this section shall be exempt from disclosure under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(i) Contract terms.--A provision of an employment contract executed, amended or entered into on or after the effective date of this subsection that conflicts with this section shall be void and unenforceable.(j) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a prospective employing law enforcement 20260HB2261PN2958 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency from conducting additional background investigations or requiring additional information or authorizations beyond the requirements of this section.(k) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Deadly force." Force that, under the circumstances in which force is used, is readily capable of causing death or serious bodily injury."Immigration enforcement." An effort to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of Federal civil immigration law. The term includes an effort to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of Federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person's presence in, entry or reentry to or employment in the United States, including a violation of 8 U.S.C. § 1253 (relating to penalties related to removal), 1324c (relating to penalties for document fraud), 1325 (relating to improper entry by alien) or 1326 (relating to reentry of removed aliens).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2261PN2958 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920